Texas, session 892, HB62.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 443, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 443.0205 to read as follows: Sec. 443.0205.  OPERABILITY OF FIRST RESPONDER AND PUBLIC SAFETY COMMUNICATION SERVICES ON CAPITOL GROUNDS. The State Preservation Board may use any available money to install repeater systems on the Capitol grounds to enhance the operability of radios, first responder and public safety broadband networks, and other communication services used in responding to a natural disaster or other emergency on the grounds, including in elevators, parking garages, the Capitol basement, and the Capitol extension. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.